Maine, session 132, LD1386.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Temporary suspension of tax on sellers of blueberries harvested in
the State. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, section 4303, for
calendar year 2025 only, a processor or shipper responsible for reporting and paying the
tax imposed by Title 36, section 4303 may not charge or collect any portion of the tax
levied under Title 36, section 4303 from a seller of wild blueberries harvested in the State
in calendar year 2025. A processor or shipper remains responsible for payment of 1/2 of
the tax imposed by Title 36, section 4303 on wild blueberries harvested in the State in
calendar year 2025 and for collection and payment of the entire tax imposed by Title 36,
section 4303 on all wild blueberries not harvested in the State in calendar year 2025.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.